California, session 20252026, AB1719.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 19913 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:19913. (a) The commission may issue an order summarily suspending a person’s work permit, whether issued by a city, county, or city and county, or by the commission, upon a finding that the suspension is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, safety, or general welfare. The order is effective when served upon the holder of the permit.(b) The order of summary suspension shall state facts upon which the finding of necessity for the suspension is based. For the purposes of this section, the order of summary suspension shall be deemed an accusation.(c) An order of summary suspension shall be signed by at least no fewer than three members of the commission.(d) The person whose work permit is summarily suspended has a right to a hearing to commence not more no later than 30 calendar days from the date of service of the suspension. suspension, unless that time is extended by mutual agreement.